Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1159
State Department of Education; school district; technical assistance; advisory capacity.

The State Department of Education, upon the request of any school district, shall provide technical assistance in the promulgation of any plan, program, or report required by the Special Education Act. Such assistance shall be given only in an advisory capacity and shall not be designed or construed to transfer, either in whole or in part, the responsibility for or actual development or implementation of such plan, program, or report.

Laws 1973, LB 403, § 22;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 43-653;

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 47;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3347;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 841.